en: Kosher-parve, Kosher parve
ca: Kosher-parve
fr: Kascher pareve, Kasher pareve, Cacher pareve, casher pareve, kacher pareve, cascher pareve, Kosher pareve, Kascher parve, Kasher parve, Cacher parve, casher parve, kacher parve, cascher parve, Kosher parve
he: כשר פרווה
it: Kosher-parve
nl: Kosher parve

en: Kosher Check, BC Kosher
ca: Comprovat Kosher, BC Kosher
he: בדיקת כשרות

en: Magen Tzedek, Hekhsher Tzedek
he: מגן צדק

en: COR Kosher
xx: COR Kosher

en: Kosher under supervision of Rabbi Weitman Tnuva
fr: Kosher under supervision of Rabbi Weitman Tnuva
he: כשר בהשגחת רבי ויטמן תנובה

en: Sephardi Kashrut Autority, sKa, Sephardi Beth Din
nl: Sephardi Kashrut Authority

en: Union of Orthodox Synagogues of South Africa
it: Unione delle Sinagoghe Ortodosse del Sudafrica

hr: Chief-rabbi-Kotel-Da-Don
xx: Chief-rabbi-Kotel-Da-Don

en: Distributor labels, Labels of distributors
ca: Etiquetes de distribuïdors
de: Handelsmarken
es: Etiquetas de distribuidores
fi: jakelijan merkit, jakelijoiden merkit
fr: Labels de distributeurs
hu: Forgalmazó címkék
it: Etichette del distributore
nl: Distributeur-labels
pt: Etiquetas de distribuidor, etiquetas de distribuidores
ru: Этикетки дистрибьюторов
zh: 分销商标签

en: Carrefour Quality, Quality Carrefour
ca: Qualitat Carrefour
de: Carrefour-Qualität
es: Calidad Carrefour, Carrefour Calidad, Carrefour Quality
fi: Carrefour-laatu
fr: Qualité Carrefour, Carrefour Qualité, Engagement Qualité Carrefour
it: Qualità Carrefour
nl: Carrefour kwaliteit

en: Charte LU Harmony, Charte Harmony, LU Harmony, Charte LU
it: Progetto Harmony di Charte LU
nl: Charte LU Harmony

hr: nase mi najbolje pase kaufland, nase mi najbolje pase, NMNP
xx: nase mi najbolje pase kaufland, nase mi najbolje pase, NMNP

en: producer labels, labels of producers
da: producentmærkater
es: etiqueta de productor
fr: label de producteur
hr: oznaka proizvođača

hr: 100% slavonsko dobro, 100% slavonsko
xx: 100% slavonsko dobro, 100% slavonsko

en: LEAF, Linking Environment and Farming, LEAF Linking Environment and Farming
xx: LEAF, Linking Environment and Farming
ru: Связанные окружающая среда и сельское хозяйство

en: low energy, low calorie
xx: low energy

en: energy reduced
xx: energy reduced

en: energy free
xx: energy free

en: Low or no fat
ca: Baix o sense greix
de: Niedrig oder kein Fett
es: Bajo o sin grasas
fi: vähärasvainen tai rasvaton, vähän rasvaa tai rasvaton
fr: Peu ou pas de matière grasse, peu ou pas gras
he: דל או ללא שומן
hr: malo ili bez masti
hu: Zsírszegény vagy zsírmentes
it: Pochi o niente grassi, Basso o nessun grasso
nl: Geen vet of vetarm
pt: Com pouca ou sem gordura, com pouco ou nenhua gordura, com poucas ou sem gorduras, com poucas ou nenhumas gorduras
ru: Низкожирный или обезжиренный
th: ไขมันต่ำหรือไม่มีเลย

en: Low fat, low in fat
xx: low fat
ca: Baix en greixos
da: Fedtfattig, Naturligt fedtfattig
de: Fettarm
es: Bajo en grasas, Bajo contenido en grasas
fi: Vähärasvainen, Vähän rasvaa, Luonnostaan vähärasvainen
fr: Peu de matière grasse, Peu gras, faible teneur en matière grasse, pauvre en matière grasse, pauvre en matières grasses
he: דל שומן
hr: nisko u mastima, s niskim sadržajem masti
hu: Zsírszegény, Alacsony zsírtartalmú
it: Basso contenuto di grassi, A basso contenuto di grassi
nb: Lavt fettinnhold, Naturlig lavt fettinnhold
nl: Vetarm
pt: Baixo teor de gordura, baixo teor de gorduras, baixo em gorduras
ru: низкожирный
sv: Låg fetthalt, Naturligt låg fetthalt
th: ไขมันต่ำ